Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB374.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXVIII-J12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY ANDCHIEF INFORMATION OFFICERSection 2801-J. Office of Information Technology.(a) Establishment.--The Office of Information Technology is established. The administrative head of the office shall be the Chief Information Officer.(b) Appointment of Chief Information Officer.--The Governor shall nominate in accordance with the provisions of the Constitution of Pennsylvania and, by and with the advice and consent of two-thirds of the members elected to the Senate, appoint the Chief Information Officer, who shall be a member of the Governor's Cabinet.(c) Powers and duties.--The Chief Information Officer shall have the following powers and duties:(1) To manage and operate information technology services of agencies under the jurisdiction of the Governor.(2) To establish and implement information technology protocols for security of data produced, collected or maintained by agencies under the jurisdiction of the Governor.(3) To manage the Office of Information Technology.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0374PN0239 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122